Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 64.06.090 and 2018 c 289 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:A seller of residential real property shall make available to the buyer the following statement: "This notice is to inform you that if the real property you are considering for purchase utilizes an oil tank for heating purposes, ((no cost insurance may be available from the pollution liability insurance agency))remediation assistance for heating oil contamination may be available. Contact the Washington State Pollution Liability Insurance Agency for more information."NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act applies prospectively only and not retroactively. It applies only to sales of property that arise on or after January 1, 2027.--- END ---